Illinois, session 104th, SB1278.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Cemetery Oversight Act is amended by 5changing Section 5-1 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 411/5-1)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)8    Sec. 5-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Cemetery Oversight Act.10(Source: P.A. 96-863, eff. 3-1-10.)